Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.220

Trustees, employees not to guarantee loans.

No trustee or employee of the department shall become an endorser or surety or an obligor for moneys loaned by the department.

[ 1991 c 35 s 37; 1947 c 80 s 23; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4995-42. Prior: 1941 c 97 s 6, part; 1939 c 86 s 6, part; 1937 c 221 s 7, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 4995-7, part. Formerly RCW 41.32.230.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.